Louisiana, session 2026, HB742.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:231.4 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 2. The Department of Children and Family Services and the Louisiana
Department of Health shall amend or repeal any rule, policy, procedure, or eligibility
standard inconsistent with the provisions of this Act and shall administer the Family
Independence Temporary Assistance Program and Medicaid program in accordance with
applicable federal and state law.
Section 3. R.S. 46:231.4 as enacted by Section 13 of Act No. 478 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Session 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-985 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 742